Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Solid and Hazardous Waste Management.

§§ 32.1-177 through 32.1-186.
Repealed by Acts 1986, c. 492.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Waste Management Act, see now § 10.1-1400 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Section 32.1-177.1, which was added by Acts 1986, c. 566, was renumbered as former § 10-270, by the Virginia Code Commission. See now § 10.1-1406.

Section 32.1-178 was amended by Acts 1986, c. 566. The amendment was incorporated in former § 10-266, which was comparable to former § 32.1-178. See now § 10.1-1402.

Section 32.1-180 was amended by Acts 1986, cc. 563, 637. The amendments by cc. 563 and 637 were incorporated in former §§ 10-279 and 10-271, respectively, which were comparable to former § 32.1-180. See now § 10.1-1426.

Section 32.1-180.1, which was added by Acts 1986, c. 563, was renumbered as former § 10-270.1, by the Virginia Code Commission.